Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-836.01
Division; sale of tangible personal property; distribution of profits.

The division may endorse and sell for profit tangible personal property related to the lottery. Any money received as profit by the division pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Lottery Operation Trust Fund to be distributed pursuant to the requirements of section 9-812.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 118;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 17;

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 22;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB497, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 53.